District of Columbia statutes.
31-1406

Cost of examinations.

All expenses of the examinations shall be paid by the company examined, and the company shall timely pay the Mayor the actual expense of such an examination upon receipt of itemized bills provided by the Mayor. For purposes of expenses assessed and paid under this section, the provisions of Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2 shall not apply.

History

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-49, § 7, 40 DCR 6110
Mar. 25, 2003, D.C. Law 14-236, § 4, 49 DCR 10483

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-3606.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-236 added the last sentence.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Procurement Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-159, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6495).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Procurement Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-314, March 26, 2002, 49 DCR 3451).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4 of Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Procurement Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-9, January 27, 2003, 50 DCR 1478).